District of Columbia statutes.
2-1209.02

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Business incubator” means a building that provides low-cost space and services to eligible tenant businesses. The term “business incubator” does not mean a multi-tenant facility that offers space alone.

(2)

“Council” means the Council of the District of Columbia.

(3)

“District” means the District of Columbia.

(4)

“Mayor” means the Mayor of the District of Columbia.

Dec. 12, 1985, D.C. Law 6-71, § 3, 32 DCR 6334

History

1981 Ed., § 1-2232.

Prior Codifications